West Virginia, session 2026, HB4219.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. Authorization for Department of health to promulgate legislative rules. §64-5-1. Department of Health. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §16-1-4 of this code, modified by the Department of Health to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 17, 2025, relating to the Department of Health (clinical laboratory practitioner licensure, 64 CSR 57), is authorized.